Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 10 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE
§ 56-1013M. Coordinated database.

The commission shall provide for the development and maintenance of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and significant investigatory information on all licensed individuals in member states.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated database on all individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of the commission, including:

Identifying information;

Licensure data;

Significant investigatory information;

Adverse actions against an individual’s license;

An indicator that an individual’s privilege to practice is restricted, suspended or revoked;

Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation;

Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial; and

Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by the rules of the commission.

The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all member states of any adverse action taken against, or significant investigative information on, any individual in a member state.

Member states contributing information to the coordinated database may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.

Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from the coordinated database.

§ 56-1013N. Rulemaking.

The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.

If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.

Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission.

Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:

On the website of the commission; and

On the website of each member state EMS authority or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.

The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:

The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;

The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;

A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and

The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.

Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.

The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:

At least twenty-five (25) persons;

A governmental subdivision or agency; or

An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.

If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing.

All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of the commission or other designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.

Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.

No transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written request for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the transcript shall bear the cost of producing the transcript. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. This subsection (8)(c) shall not preclude the commission from making a transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section.
(9) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received.

(10) The commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.

(11) If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing.

(12) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:

(a) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;

(b) Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;

(c) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule; or

(d) Protect public health and safety.

(13) The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the chair of the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission.

§ 56-1013O. Oversight, dispute resolution and enforcement.

Oversight.

The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.

All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission.

The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.

Default, technical assistance, and termination.

If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default and/or any other action to be taken by the commission; and provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.

Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and each of the member states.

A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.

The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state.

The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

Dispute Resolution.

Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember states.

The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(4) Enforcement.

The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

(a) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.

(b) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

§ 56-1013P. Date of implementation of the interstate commission for EMS personnel practice and associated rules, withdrawal and amendment.

The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and administration of the compact.

Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission’s initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.

Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.

A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.

Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s EMS authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any EMS personnel licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.

This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.

§ 56-1013Q. Construction and severability.

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state member thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this compact supersedes state law or rules related to licensure of EMS agencies.

§ 56-1014. Liability.

No act or omission of any person who is duly licensed under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, by the EMS bureau done or omitted in good faith while rendering emergency medical services to a person or persons who are perceived to need immediate care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury shall impose any liability upon those personnel, the supervising physician, the hospital, the organization providing the service, or upon a federal, state, county, city or other local governmental unit, or upon employees of such governmental unit, unless such provider of care or such personnel be shown to have caused injury and damages to such person or persons as a proximate result of his, her or their reckless or grossly negligent misconduct, which shall be the sole grounds for civil liability of such persons in the provision of care or assistance under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, regardless of the circumstance under which such care or assistance may be provided. This section shall not relieve the organization or agency operating the service from the duty of securing, maintaining and operating, the equipment and licensure designated for use in performing the emergency medical services.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to licensed personnel of another state of the United States who enter this state in response to an emergency to render emergency medical services to a person who is perceived to need immediate care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury.

No act or omission of any person authorized under this chapter to provide community health emergency medical services shall impose any liability upon such person or the person’s agency or supervising physician where the act or omission occurs in the course of providing authorized services and is done or omitted in good faith, unless the person is shown to have caused injury as a result of reckless or grossly negligent misconduct.

§ 56-1015. Failure to obtain consent.

No person licensed under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, or physician or hospital licensed in this state shall be subject to civil liability, based solely upon failure to obtain consent in rendering emergency medical, surgical, hospital or health services to any individual regardless of age where that individual is unable to give this consent for any reason and there is no other person reasonably available who is legally authorized to consent to the providing of such care, provided, however, that such person, physician, or hospital has acted in good faith and without knowledge of facts negating consent. The provision or refusal of consent under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, shall be governed by chapter 45, title 39, Idaho Code.

§ 56-1016. Agency minimum standards.

Each ambulance service, air medical service and nontransport service shall be licensed by the EMS bureau based on the level of licensed personnel it utilizes, transport capability and self-declared geographic coverage area and shall meet the following standards:

Personnel during transport or transfer — There shall be at least two (2) crew members on each patient transport or transfer, with the crew member delivering patient care being, at a minimum, a licensed emergency medical technician (EMT) or a licensed emergency medical responder (EMR) with a valid ambulance certification issued by the EMS bureau.

Dispatch — Each licensed EMS agency shall have a twenty-four (24) hour dispatch arrangement and shall respond to calls on a twenty-four (24) hour basis.

Agency inspections and licensing — The EMS bureau shall conduct inspections at least annually related to agency licensing or shall contract to have the inspections carried out. Each agency shall have a current state license in order to operate.

Ambulance service minimum standards waiver — The controlling authority providing ambulance services may petition the board for waiver of the ambulance standards of section 56-1016(2), Idaho Code, if compliance with these standards would cause undue hardship on the community being served, or would result in abandonment of ambulance services.

Nontransport service minimum standards waiver — The controlling authority providing nontransport services may petition the EMS bureau for waiver of the twenty-four (24) hour response requirement of this section if the petition demonstrates that the community, setting, industrial site or event is not populated on a twenty-four (24) hour basis or does not exist on a three hundred sixty-five (365) day per year basis or if compliance with these standards would cause undue hardship on the community being served, or would result in abandonment of nontransport services.

Supervision — A licensed physician shall supervise the medical activities provided by licensed personnel affiliated with the licensed agency including, but not limited to: establishing standing orders and protocols, reviewing performance of licensed personnel, approving methods for licensed personnel to receive instructions for patient care via radio, telephone or in person, and other oversight as provided in the rules of the commission.

Applicants must submit the following information with their applications and agree to meet the following requirements as a condition of licensure:

A declaration of anticipated applicant agency costs and revenues; a statement of projected changes in response time; and a narrative describing projected clinical benefits to patients resulting from licensure using methods defined in board rules concerning such matters on an application provided by the EMS bureau; and

Collect and report data to the EMS bureau upon receiving a license using a data collection system that is validated as compliant by the national emergency medical services information system technical assistance center in accordance with board rules.

The EMS bureau will provide notice of any such application to all cities, counties and other units of local government that have any geographic coverage area in common with the applicant in accordance with board rules. Such notice will include a summary of the applicant data supplied to the EMS bureau. Any other EMS bureau use of the cost and revenue data supplied by applicants is limited exclusively to informational purposes.
(9) Appeal of a denial of an applicant’s license will be governed by IDAPA 16.05.03, rules governing contested case proceedings and declaratory rulings.

§ 56-1017. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 56-1018. Emergency medical services fund.

There is hereby created in the dedicated fund of the state treasury a fund known as the “Emergency Medical Services Fund.” Subject to appropriation by the legislature, moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes of emergency medical services training, communications, vehicle and equipment grants, and other programs furthering the goals of highway safety and emergency response providing medical services at motor vehicle accidents.

§ 56-1018A. Emergency medical services fund II.

There is hereby created in the dedicated fund of the state treasury a fund known as the emergency medical services fund II. Subject to appropriation by the legislature, moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes of emergency medical services.

§ 56-1018B. Emergency medical services fund III.

There is hereby created in the dedicated fund of the state treasury a fund known as the emergency medical services fund III. Subject to appropriation by the legislature, moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of acquiring vehicles and equipment for use by emergency medical services personnel in the performance of their duties, which include highway safety and emergency response to motor vehicle accidents.

The bureau of emergency medical services of the department of health and welfare shall be responsible for distributing moneys from the fund to qualifying nonprofit and governmental entities that submit an application for a grant from the fund. The bureau shall approve grants based on the following criteria:

The requesting entity is a nonprofit or governmental entity that holds a current license as an ambulance or nontransport service issued by the state of Idaho;

The requesting entity has demonstrated need based on criteria established by the bureau;

The requesting entity has provided verification that it has received the approval and endorsement of a fire district or city or county within its service area;

The requesting entity has certified that the title to any vehicle purchased with funds from the fund shall be in the name of the fire district or city or county that endorsed the application and shall submit proof of titling as soon as practicable;

The state of Idaho shall retain a security interest in the vehicle to secure the performance of the grant recipient to utilize the vehicle consistent with the intent described in the application.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this section, the bureau of emergency medical services is authorized to approve and issue a grant to an applicant in the absence of an endorsement if the endorsement is withheld without adequate justification.

§ 56-1019. Services to victims of cystic fibrosis.

The department of health and welfare shall establish, through the crippled children’s program, a program of services to persons suffering from cystic fibrosis who are twenty-one (21) years or more of age. The department shall establish uniform standards of financial eligibility for services provided under this section.

§ 56-1020. Penalties for personnel license violations.

Any person who practices or attempts to practice EMS as a licensed provider of emergency care as provided for in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, without having at the time of so doing a valid, unexpired, unrestricted, unrevoked and unsuspended license issued by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for each violation. In the event that the prosecuting attorney in the county where the alleged violation occurred fails or refuses to act within sixty (60) days of notification of the alleged violation, the attorney general is authorized to prosecute the alleged violation.

§ 56-1021. Penalties for agency license violations.

Any person establishing, conducting, managing or operating any agency as provided for in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, without a license issued by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each day of continuing violation shall constitute a separate offense. In the event that the prosecuting attorney in the county where the alleged violation occurred fails or refuses to act within sixty (60) days of notification of the alleged violation, the attorney general is authorized to prosecute the alleged violation.

§ 56-1022. Personnel and agencies licensure actions — Grounds — Procedure.

Subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the EMS bureau, upon recommendation of the commission, may deny a license or refuse to renew a license for a person, or may suspend or revoke a license or may impose probationary conditions if the holder of a license or the applicant for a license has engaged in unprofessional conduct which has endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the public. Such unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to:

Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact;

Being found guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined by rule established by the board;

Being convicted of a crime which would have a direct and adverse bearing on the licensee’s ability to practice or perform emergency medical care competently;

The unauthorized practice of medicine;

Violating any provisions of sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, or any of the rules established by the board or the commission thereunder; or

Being found mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the EMS bureau may deny, revoke or refuse to renew a license of an agency, or may impose probationary conditions or fines as a condition of an agency’s ability to retain a license in accordance with board rule.

A denial, refusal to renew, suspension, revocation or imposition of probationary conditions upon a license may be ordered by the EMS bureau after opportunity for a hearing in a manner provided by rule established by the board. An application for reinstatement may be filed with the EMS bureau one (1) year from the date of license revocation. In the event a timely application is filed, the EMS bureau shall:

Hold a hearing to consider such reinstatement; and

Accept or reject the application for reinstatement.

§ 56-1023. Rules.

The commission is authorized and directed to adopt appropriate rules defining the allowable scope of practice and acts and duties which can be performed by persons licensed by the EMS bureau and the required level of supervision by a licensed physician.

The board is authorized and directed to adopt appropriate rules and standards concerning the administration of sections 56-1011 through 56-1022 and this section, Idaho Code, including criteria for educational programs, certification and licensure of personnel, certification of EMS instructors, licensure of ambulance, air medical and nontransport services, manufacturing standards for ambulances and nontransport vehicles, criteria for the use of air medical services by licensed EMS personnel at emergency scenes, establishment of fees for training, inspections and licensure, appropriate requirements for renewal of licensure of personnel and agencies and the management of complaints, investigations and license actions against licensed EMS personnel and agencies. The rules of the board must be consistent with the rules adopted by the commission.

Additionally, the department shall develop guidelines, standards and procedures for reducing exposure to pathogens from human blood, tissue or fluids. Such guidelines, standards and procedures shall be made available to all law enforcement personnel, all emergency medical services personnel and agencies, and such other emergency personnel who request such information.

§ 56-1024. Idaho time sensitive emergency system of care — Statement of intent.

Time sensitive emergencies, specifically blunt trauma injuries, strokes and heart attacks, were three (3) of the top five (5) causes of deaths in Idaho in 2011. Numerous studies throughout the United States have demonstrated that organized systems of care improve patient outcomes, thus reducing the frequency of preventable death and improving the functional status of the patient. The institute of medicine’s report “Hospital-Based Emergency Care: At the Breaking Point” recommended improving the care of critical illness through regionalization by transporting critically ill patients to designated specialized care centers when appropriate. Early treatment and transfer when necessary will save the lives of Idahoans stricken with these emergency conditions. Trauma systems of care are well understood as they have existed in many other states for decades. It is the intent of this legislation to create an integrated and responsive system of care for Idaho citizens. The trauma component will serve as the initial framework in a deliberate, incremental implementation approach for a comprehensive system of care for time sensitive emergencies in Idaho. The time sensitive emergency system in Idaho is intended to be voluntary and inclusive. The system will be designed such that all facilities, and in particular critical access hospitals, have the opportunity to participate. No facility shall be excluded from receiving medically appropriate patients based solely on the facility’s decision of not seeking designation.

§ 56-1025. Definitions.

As used in sections 56-1024 through 56-1030, Idaho Code:

“EMS agency” means any organization licensed by the EMS bureau that operates an air medical service, ambulance service or nontransport service.

“EMS bureau” means the bureau of emergency medical services of the department of health and welfare.

“Council” means the Idaho time sensitive emergency system council.

“TSE” means time sensitive emergency, specifically trauma, stroke and heart attack.

§ 56-1026. Idaho time sensitive emergency system — Creation.

There is hereby created a voluntary time sensitive emergency system within the department of health and welfare.

§ 56-1027. Idaho time sensitive emergency system council — Creation — Composition.

There is hereby created the Idaho time sensitive emergency system council hereinafter known as the “council.” Council members shall be appointed by the governor with the approval of the board of health and welfare. Council members shall be selected to assure equitable geographic, rural and clinical specialty representation.

The membership of the council shall include the following:

One (1) representative from a facility that either holds or is seeking designation as an Idaho trauma center. The representative shall be the medical director, the coordinator or the program manager responsible for the respective facility’s trauma program;

One (1) representative from a facility that either holds or is seeking designation as an Idaho stroke facility. The representative shall be the medical director, the coordinator or the program manager responsible for the respective facility’s stroke program;

One (1) representative from a facility that either holds or is seeking designation as an Idaho heart attack center. The representative shall be the medical director, the coordinator or the program manager responsible for the respective facility’s heart attack program;

One (1) representative from an EMS agency licensed by the department that serves a primarily urban response area;

One (1) representative from an EMS agency licensed by the department that serves a primarily rural response area;

One (1) representative from an air medical EMS agency licensed by the department;

One (1) administrator of an Idaho hospital that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma, stroke or heart attack designation;

One (1) chief executive officer or administrator of an Idaho critical access hospital that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma, stroke or heart attack designation;

One (1) licensed health care provider who routinely works in the emergency department of a hospital that serves a primarily urban area that either holds or is seeking trauma, stroke or heart attack designation;

One (1) licensed health care provider who routinely works in the emergency department of a hospital that serves a primarily rural area that either holds or is seeking trauma, stroke or heart attack designation; and

One (1) Idaho citizen with an interest in furthering the quality of trauma, stroke and heart attack care in Idaho.

The chair of each regional TSE committee shall be added as a voting member of the council when the regional TSE committee is implemented and the chair is selected.

Members of the council shall serve four (4) year terms with half of the members initially appointed, as determined by lot, serving two (2) year terms. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the unexpired term. Members may be reappointed and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

§ 56-1028. Idaho time sensitive emergency system council — Duties — Rulemaking.

The duties of the council shall be as follows:

Develop, implement and monitor a voluntary statewide system that includes trauma, stroke and heart attack facilities;

Provide oversight of the system, assuring adherence to standards established by the council;

Establish substate system regions that provide more effective access to the system. In the designation of these regions, specific consideration shall be given to geography and patient referral patterns for the facilities and agencies included therein;

Establish a regional TSE committee in each substate region;

Develop the standards and criteria that each participating facility that voluntarily applies is required to meet concerning personnel, equipment, resources, data collection and organizational capabilities to obtain or maintain designation;

Develop procedures for and the duration of the designation of a trauma, stroke or heart attack facility, including application procedures, verification procedures, investigation of complaints pertaining to designation and emergency suspension or revocation of designation;

Develop operational procedures for the regional TSE committees;

Facilitate the implementation of nationally accepted standards throughout the voluntary system;

Set procedures for the acquisition of data needed to successfully manage the system;

Promulgate rules to fulfill the purpose of this act; and

Collaborate and cooperate with the EMS bureau, the EMS physician commission, local governments, local EMS agencies and associations to address recruitment and retention concerns of local EMS providers.

§ 56-1029. Idaho trauma, stroke and heart attack centers — Designation.

The council shall designate a hospital as a trauma, stroke or heart attack center when such hospital, upon proper application and verification, has been found by the council to meet the applicable level of trauma, stroke or heart attack center criteria as established by the council.

In developing trauma, stroke and heart attack center designation criteria, the council shall use, as is practicable, appropriate peer-reviewed or evidence-based research including, but not limited to, the most recent guidelines of the American college of surgeons committee on trauma, American college of cardiology and American heart association for heart attack centers, or the joint commission’s primary stroke center certification program criteria for stroke centers, or primary and comprehensive stroke center recommendations as published by the American stroke association or other nationally recognized authoritative standards.

Participation criteria shall be published in rules promulgated by the council.

The council shall conduct a periodic verification review of every trauma, heart attack and stroke facility. Verification reviews shall be coordinated for the different types of centers to the extent practicable with hospital resources. No person who has a substantial conflict of interest in the operation of any trauma, stroke and heart attack center under review shall participate in the verification review of the facility.

The council shall coordinate an on-site review as necessary to assure that a hospital meets the criteria for the desired designation. The council may waive an on-site review when a hospital has been verified by a nationally recognized accrediting body to meet or exceed standards established by the council.

The council may deny, place on probation, suspend or revoke any designation when it has reasonable cause to believe that there has been misrepresentation or falsification of information or a substantial failure to comply with the criteria for designation promulgated by the council. If the council has reasonable cause to believe that a hospital is not in compliance with such provisions, it may require the facility to submit additional documentation or undergo additional site reviews to verify compliance.

No hospital may hold itself out to the public as an Idaho designated trauma center, Idaho designated stroke facility or Idaho designated heart attack facility unless it is designated as such by the council.

A hospital aggrieved because of the council’s decision shall be entitled to appeal to the council in the manner prescribed by the council and shall be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing.

Actions of the council relating to adoption of rules, notice, hearings, appeals from decisions of the department or the director, and review shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the administrative procedure act.